Illinois, session 104th, SB3450.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-15.5-10 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-15.5-10)7    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 8delayed effective date)9    Sec. 11-15.5-10. Prohibitions. A municipality may regulate 10or prohibit the installation of a solar energy system or 11low-voltage solar-powered devices in a way that is consistent 12with the municipality's comprehensive plan or zoning 13authority, including within the municipality's one and 14one-half mile extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction 15Notwithstanding any provision of this Code or other provision 16of law, the adoption of any ordinance or resolution or the 17exercise of any power, by municipality that prohibits or has 18the effect of prohibiting the installation of a solar energy 19system or low-voltage solar-powered devices is expressly 20prohibited. Municipalities that own local electric 21distribution systems may adopt and implement reasonable 22policies, consistent with Section 17-900 of the Public 23Utilities Act, regarding the interconnection and use of solar   SB3450- 2 -LRB104 16309 TRT 29695 b1energy systems.2(Source: P.A. 104-458, eff. 6-1-26.)